Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 1. Legislative Council.

Sec. 24.20.010.
Legislative council established.

The Alaska Legislative Council is established as a permanent interim committee and service agency of the legislature.
The establishment of the council recognizes the need of the legislature for full-time technical assistance in accomplishing the research, reporting, bill drafting, and examination and revision of statutes, and general administrative services essential to the development of sound legislation in the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 1960)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 11.

Sec. 24.20.020.
Membership.

The legislative council is composed of the president of the senate and six other senators appointed by the president, and the speaker of the house of representatives and six other representatives appointed by the speaker.
The membership from each house shall include at least one member from each of the two major political parties.
The appointing authority in each house shall make and announce the appointment or reappointment of members of the council within 15 days after the convening of the first regular session of each legislature.

History.

(§ 2 ch 17 SLA 1960; am § 57 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.20.030.
Term of membership.

Members serve for the duration of the legislature during which they are appointed.

When a member of the council files a declaration of candidacy for an elective office other than that of member of either house of the legislature, and the member has not resigned from membership on the council, the member’s council membership terminates on the date of filing.

History.

(§ 3 ch 17 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 146 SLA 1984)

Sec. 24.20.040.
Vacancies.

When a vacancy occurs in the statutory or appointive membership of the council, the presiding officer of the house incurring the vacancy shall fill the vacancy within 30 days. If the office of the president of the senate or speaker of the house of representatives becomes vacant and a vacancy occurs among the appointed members of the council, the remaining council members from the house incurring the vacancy shall appoint a new member.
A legislator appointed to fill a vacancy shall be a member of the same political party as the member vacating the seat, when possible.

History.

(§ 4 ch 17 SLA 1960; am § 36 ch 53 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 11 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.20.050.
Executive director and staff.

The council hires an executive director and determines the director’s salary. The executive director shall serve as the executive officer for the council in the accomplishment of its functions through the Legislative Affairs Agency.
The executive director serves at the direction and at the pleasure of the council.
The executive director is authorized to employ and determine the compensation of the members of the professional and clerical staffs of the agency within the limitation of the budget approved by the council.
The executive director and the members of the professional staff shall maintain the integrity of the council’s functions and services on behalf of the legislative branch by refraining from joining or supporting any partisan political organization, faction, or activity that would tend to undermine the essential nonpartisan nature of their functions and services. However, this section does not restrict the executive director or members of the professional staff from expressing private opinion, registering, or voting.

History.

(§ 5 ch 17 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 126 SLA 1966)

Sec. 24.20.055.
Information systems.

The executive director of the Legislative Affairs Agency shall establish information systems guidelines and prepare a short-range and long-range information systems plan for the legislative branch. The guidelines and plan must be adapted to the special needs of the legislative branch as determined by the Alaska Legislative Council and, when it is in the agency’s best interest, consistent with the telecommunications information guidelines and plan adopted by the commissioner of administration under AS

44.21.350

—

44.21.390

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 25 SLA 2005)

Sec. 24.20.060.
Powers.

The legislative council has the power

to organize and adopt rules for the conduct of its business;

to hold public hearings, administer oaths, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, and to have the deposition of witnesses taken in a manner prescribed by court rule or law for taking depositions in civil actions when consistent with the powers and duties assigned to the council by AS

24.20.010

—

24.20.140

;

to call upon all state officials, agencies, and institutions to give full cooperation to the council and its executive director by collecting and furnishing information, conducting studies, and making recommendations;

in addition to providing the administrative services required for the operation of the legislative branch,

to provide the technical staff assistance in research, reporting, drafting, and counseling requested by standing, interim, and special committees and spot research and drafting services for individual members in conformity with law and legislative rules;

to conduct a continuing program for the revision and publication of the acts of the legislature;

to execute a program for the oversight of the administration and construction of laws by state agencies and the courts through regulations, opinions, and rulings;

to operate and maintain the state legislative reference library;

to do all things necessary to carry out legislative directives and law, and the duties set out in the uniform rules of the legislature;

to sue in the name of the legislature during the interim between sessions if authorized by majority vote of the full membership of the council;

to exercise control and direction over all legislative space, supplies, and equipment and permanent legislative help between legislative sessions; the exercise of control over legislative space is subject to AS

36.30.080(c)

if the exercise involves the rent or lease of facilities, and to AS

36.30.085

if the exercise involves the acquisition of facilities by lease-purchase or lease-financing agreement;

to produce, publish, distribute, and to contract for the printing of reports, memoranda, and other materials it finds necessary to the accomplishment of its work;

to take appropriate action for the preconvening and post-session work of each legislative session including the employment one week in advance of each session of not more than 10 temporary legislative employees; the continuing employment of the temporary legislative employees is subject to legislative approval when the session convenes;

to establish a legislative internship program on a cooperative basis with the University of Alaska that will provide for the assignment of interns to standing committees of each house of the legislature during regular sessions of the legislature; and

to establish reasonable fees for services and materials provided by the Legislative Affairs Agency to entities outside of the legislative branch of state government and charges for collecting the fees; all fees and charges collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the general fund.

History.

(§ 6 ch 17 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 126 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 57 SLA 1979; am § 10 ch 87 SLA 1979; am § 38 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, former subparagraphs (4)(E)-(G) were relettered as (4)(D)-(F) to reflect the 1971 repeal of former (4)(D).

Sec. 24.20.061.
Administrative services for legislature.

All administrative services necessary to the operation of the legislature during and between sessions are provided by the legislative council.
These services include procurement, storage, and maintenance of all supplies and equipment; interim control of legislative space; fiscal and personnel services except for the legislative budget and audit committee; supervision of duplicating, distributing, and mailing services; and budget preparation.

History.

(§ 23 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 47 SLA 1961; am § 35 ch 53 SLA 1973)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

24.05.200

.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.20.062.
Legislative internship program.

A legislative internship program established by the legislative council under AS

24.20.060

(8) shall provide that

the University of Alaska provide academic support and credit to the program;

students enrolled and in good standing at any accredited postsecondary educational institution who have successfully completed at least two years of study are eligible to participate in the program;

interns will be selected by a committee composed of members of the legislature appointed by the legislative council and representatives of the university appointed by the university;

interns will be selected on the basis of their experience and interest in subjects which the legislative council feels are likely to be considered during a legislative session;

legislative interns are entitled to receive academic credit and payment of $30 for each day of participation in the program during the legislative session.

History.

(§ 11 ch 87 SLA 1979)

Sec. 24.20.065.
Examination of regulations and opinions.

The legislative council shall annually examine administrative regulations, published opinions of state and federal courts and of the Department of Law, and final decisions adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) that rely on state statutes or the common law of the state to determine if

the courts and agencies are properly implementing legislative purposes;

there are court or agency expressions of dissatisfaction with state statutes or the common law of the state;

the opinions, decisions, or regulations indicate unclear or ambiguous statutes;

the courts have modified or revised the common law of the state.

The legislative council shall prepare a comprehensive report of the annual examination with recommendations and, at the start of each regular session, notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1989; am § 46 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 24.20.070.
Revision of statutes.

The legislature may direct the council to revise the laws of the state in the form of a bulk formal revision. At the direction of the legislature and within the limit of appropriations made, the council may enter into contracts for the printing, annotating, indexing, and distribution of a revision of the laws of the state. The council receives sufficient copies of a revision for exchange with other states and jurisdictions. A revision prepared by the council under authority of this section shall be referred to the legislature for enactment or adoption.

Statute revision is a continuing responsibility of the council. The general and permanent acts of each regular and special session of the legislature shall be integrated with and published as annual supplements to or replacement pamphlets for the Alaska Statutes.

History.

(§ 7 ch 17 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 100 SLA 1963)

Sec. 24.20.075.
Alaska Code Revision Commission. [Repealed, § 33 ch 23 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 24.20.080.
Intergovernmental cooperation.

The council may encourage and arrange conferences with officials of other states and nations and of other units of government and propose cooperation between this state and other states and nations. The council constitutes the Alaska Commission on Interstate Cooperation in participating in and carrying out the programs of the Council of State Governments as they apply to Alaska. The chairman of the council serves as chairman of the commission.

History.

(§ 8 ch 17 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 126 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 1972)

Sec. 24.20.090.
Assignment of projects.

The council may be assigned projects or subjects for study, reporting, or drafting. Assignment shall be by resolution. The council may determine a schedule of priorities for these and other assignments or requests based on feasibility, time, and the availability of funds and staff.

History.

(§ 9 ch 17 SLA 1960)

Sec. 24.20.100.
Research and drafting services for legislators.

Members of the legislature may utilize the research and bill drafting services of the Legislative Affairs Agency. Requests by members of the legislature are confidential. Staff services for members of the legislature shall be accomplished subject only to the priority of assignments determined by the council.

History.

(§ 10 ch 17 SLA 1960)

Sec. 24.20.105.
Review of proposed regulations.

History.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 7 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 24.20.110.
Meetings.

The legislative council may meet during sessions of the legislature and during intervals between sessions at such times and places inside the state as the chairman may determine. The council shall meet immediately after the appointment of its membership at the first regular session of each legislature for purposes of organization. Minutes of each meeting shall be kept. One-half of the membership constitutes a quorum to do business. Members may receive, for the minimum time required to get to and from meetings and while attending meetings, the same travel fare and per diem allowances provided by law for members of the legislature when attending sessions.

History.

(§ 11 ch 17 SLA 1960)

Sec. 24.20.120.
Reports.

The council shall prepare a summary report of its findings and recommendations for each legislature and notify the legislature that the report is available. The council shall, from time to time, submit memorandum reports to the legislature on matters referred to it or coming before it. Bills supporting council recommendations may be filed or prefiled in accordance with the uniform rules of the legislature. Reports released by the council are public and may be made available at a reasonable cost.

History.

(§ 12 ch 17 SLA 1960; am § 47 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 24.20.130.
Budgets.

The council shall submit a budget of its anticipated needs for each fiscal year to the finance committees of the legislature. The executive director shall annually submit an estimated budget to the governor for information purposes in the preparation of the executive budget. The council staff shall also assist, as needed, in preparing a budget of the anticipated annual needs of the legislature.

History.

(§ 13 ch 17 SLA 1960)

Sec. 24.20.132.
Legislative budget and expenses.

The estimate of operating expenses for the legislature shall be included in the annual budget submitted by the legislative council.
A summary total by major item shall be submitted by the council to the governor for information purposes in the preparation of the executive budget.
A detailed budget document shall be submitted to the house and senate finance committees. All disbursements from legislative appropriations shall be certified by the bonded certifying officer designated by the council.

History.

(§ 28 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 8 ch 47 SLA 1961)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

24.05.210

.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.20.140.
Appropriations.

Appropriations for carrying out AS

24.20.010

—

24.20.140

shall be set out in the appropriation bill authorizing operating expenditures submitted to the legislature under AS 37.07.020(a)(2) or other bills as may be necessary. The council may direct the executive director to transfer amounts from one appropriation to another if the transfer is considered necessary to accomplish the work of the council. The council may not exceed the total amount of the authorized appropriation. All expenditures of the council are subject to an independent audit that shall be made annually.

In addition to transfers under (a) of this section, the council may direct the executive director to transfer amounts from any appropriation to an office, agency, or committee in the legislative branch to an appropriation for another office, agency, or committee in the legislative branch. A transfer under this subsection may only be made with the written approval of the head of the legislative office or agency or the chair of the committee to which the appropriation was originally made, and the amount transferred from that appropriation may not exceed the amount indicated in the written approval.

History.

(§ 14 ch 17 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 30 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 34 SLA 2007)